Missouri, session 2026, SB908.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Sections 21.750, 571.030, 571.101, 571.117,
2 571.205, and 571.225, RSMo, are repealed and six new sections
3 enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 21.750,
4 571.030, 571.101, 571.117, 571.205, and 571.225, to read as
5 follows:
1 21.750. 1. The general assembly hereby occupies and
2 preempts the entire field of legislation touching in any way
3 firearms, components, ammunition and supplies to the
4 complete exclusion of any order, ordinance or regulation by
5 any political subdivision of this state. Any existing or
6 future orders, ordinances or regulations in this field are
7 hereby and shall be null and void except as provided in
8 subsection 3 of this section.
9 2. No county, city, town, village, municipality, or
10 other political subdivision of this state shall adopt any
11 order, ordinance or regulation concerning in any way the
12 sale, purchase, purchase delay, transfer, ownership, use,
13 keeping, possession, bearing, transportation, licensing,
14 permit, registration, taxation other than sales and
15 compensating use taxes or other controls on firearms,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 908 2
16 components, ammunition, and supplies except as provided in
17 subsection 3 of this section.
18 3. [(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this
19 subsection,] Nothing contained in this section shall
20 prohibit any ordinance of any political subdivision which
21 conforms exactly with any of the provisions of sections
22 571.010 to 571.070, with appropriate penalty provisions, [or
23 which regulates the open carrying of firearms readily
24 capable of lethal use] or the discharge of firearms within a
25 jurisdiction, provided such ordinance complies with the
26 provisions of section 252.243. No ordinance shall be
27 construed to preclude the use of a firearm in the defense of
28 person or property, subject to the provisions of chapter 563.
29 [(2) In any jurisdiction in which the open carrying of
30 firearms is prohibited by ordinance, the open carrying of
31 firearms shall not be prohibited in accordance with the
32 following:
33 (a) Any person with a valid concealed carry
34 endorsement or permit who is open carrying a firearm shall
35 be required to have a valid concealed carry endorsement or
36 permit from this state, or a permit from another state that
37 is recognized by this state, in his or her possession at all
38 times;
39 (b) Any person open carrying a firearm in such
40 jurisdiction shall display his or her concealed carry
41 endorsement or permit upon demand of a law enforcement
42 officer;
43 (c) In the absence of any reasonable and articulable
44 suspicion of criminal activity, no person carrying a
45 concealed or unconcealed firearm shall be disarmed or
46 physically restrained by a law enforcement officer unless
47 under arrest; and

SB 908 3
48 (d) Any person who violates this subdivision shall be
49 subject to the penalty provided in section 571.121.]
50 4. The lawful design, marketing, manufacture,
51 distribution, or sale of firearms or ammunition to the
52 public is not an abnormally dangerous activity and does not
53 constitute a public or private nuisance.
54 5. No county, city, town, village or any other
55 political subdivision nor the state shall bring suit or have
56 any right to recover against any firearms or ammunition
57 manufacturer, trade association or dealer for damages,
58 abatement or injunctive relief resulting from or relating to
59 the lawful design, manufacture, marketing, distribution, or
60 sale of firearms or ammunition to the public. This
61 subsection shall apply to any suit pending as of October 12,
62 2003, as well as any suit which may be brought in the
63 future. Provided, however, that nothing in this section
64 shall restrict the rights of individual citizens to recover
65 for injury or death caused by the negligent or defective
66 design or manufacture of firearms or ammunition.
67 6. Nothing in this section shall prevent the state, a
68 county, city, town, village or any other political
69 subdivision from bringing an action against a firearms or
70 ammunition manufacturer or dealer for breach of contract or
71 warranty as to firearms or ammunition purchased by the state
72 or such political subdivision.
73 7. Any political subdivision who knowingly violates
74 the provisions of this section or otherwise knowingly
75 deprives a citizen of Missouri of the rights or privileges
76 ensured by Amendment II of the Constitution of the United
77 States or Article I, Section 23 of the Constitution of
78 Missouri shall be liable to the injured party in an action
79 at law, suit in equity, or other proper proceeding for

SB 908 4
80 redress, and subject to a civil penalty of fifty thousand
81 dollars per occurrence. Any person injured under this
82 section shall have standing to pursue an action for
83 injunctive relief in the circuit court of the county in
84 which the action allegedly occurred or in the circuit court
85 of Cole County with respect to the actions of such
86 individual. The court shall hold a hearing on the motion
87 for temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction
88 within thirty days of service of the petition.
89 8. In such actions, the court may award the prevailing
90 party, other than the state of Missouri or any political
91 subdivision of the state, reasonable attorney's fees and
92 costs.
93 9. Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative
94 defense in any action pursuant to this section.
1 571.030. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
2 use of weapons, except as otherwise provided by sections
3 571.101 to 571.121, if he or she knowingly:
4 (1) Carries concealed upon or about his or her person
5 a knife, a firearm, a blackjack or any other weapon readily
6 capable of lethal use into any area where firearms are
7 restricted under section 571.107; or
8 (2) Sets a spring gun; or
9 (3) Discharges or shoots a firearm into a dwelling
10 house, a railroad train, boat, aircraft, or motor vehicle as
11 defined in section 302.010, or any building or structure
12 used for the assembling of people; or
13 (4) Exhibits, in the presence of one or more persons,
14 any weapon readily capable of lethal use in an angry or
15 threatening manner; or
16 (5) Has a firearm or projectile weapon readily capable
17 of lethal use on his or her person, while he or she is

SB 908 5
18 intoxicated, and handles or otherwise uses such firearm or
19 projectile weapon in either a negligent or unlawful manner
20 or discharges such firearm or projectile weapon unless
21 acting in self-defense; or
22 (6) Discharges a firearm within one hundred yards of
23 any occupied schoolhouse, courthouse, or church building; or
24 (7) Discharges or shoots a firearm at a mark, at any
25 object, or at random, on, along or across a public highway
26 or discharges or shoots a firearm into any outbuilding; or
27 (8) Carries a firearm or any other weapon readily
28 capable of lethal use into any church or place where people
29 have assembled for worship, or into any election precinct on
30 any election day, or into any building owned or occupied by
31 any agency of the federal government, state government, or
32 political subdivision thereof; or
33 (9) Discharges or shoots a firearm at or from a motor
34 vehicle, as defined in section 301.010, discharges or shoots
35 a firearm at any person, or at any other motor vehicle, or
36 at any building or habitable structure, unless the person
37 was lawfully acting in self-defense; or
38 (10) Carries a firearm, whether loaded or unloaded, or
39 any other weapon readily capable of lethal use into any
40 school, onto any school bus, or onto the premises of any
41 function or activity sponsored or sanctioned by school
42 officials or the district school board; or
43 (11) Possesses a firearm while also knowingly in
44 possession of a controlled substance that is sufficient for
45 a felony violation of section 579.015.
46 2. Subdivisions (1), (8), and (10) of subsection 1 of
47 this section shall not apply to the persons described in
48 this subsection, regardless of whether such uses are
49 reasonably associated with or are necessary to the

SB 908 6
50 fulfillment of such person's official duties except as
51 otherwise provided in this subsection. Subdivisions (3),
52 (4), (6), (7), and (9) of subsection 1 of this section shall
53 not apply to or affect any of the following persons, when
54 such uses are reasonably associated with or are necessary to
55 the fulfillment of such person's official duties, except as
56 otherwise provided in this subsection:
57 (1) All state, county and municipal peace officers who
58 have completed the training required by the police officer
59 standards and training commission pursuant to sections
60 590.030 to 590.050 and who possess the duty and power of
61 arrest for violation of the general criminal laws of the
62 state or for violation of ordinances of counties or
63 municipalities of the state, whether such officers are on or
64 off duty, and whether such officers are within or outside of
65 the law enforcement agency's jurisdiction, or all qualified
66 retired peace officers, as defined in subsection 12 of this
67 section, and who carry the identification defined in
68 subsection 13 of this section, or any person summoned by
69 such officers to assist in making arrests or preserving the
70 peace while actually engaged in assisting such officer;
71 (2) Wardens, superintendents and keepers of prisons,
72 penitentiaries, jails and other institutions for the
73 detention of persons accused or convicted of crime;
74 (3) Members of the Armed Forces or National Guard
75 while performing their official duty;
76 (4) Those persons vested by Article V, Section 1 of
77 the Constitution of Missouri with the judicial power of the
78 state and those persons vested by Article III of the
79 Constitution of the United States with the judicial power of
80 the United States, the members of the federal judiciary;

SB 908 7
81 (5) Any person whose bona fide duty is to execute
82 process, civil or criminal;
83 (6) Any federal probation officer or federal flight
84 deck officer as defined under the federal flight deck
85 officer program, 49 U.S.C. Section 44921, regardless of
86 whether such officers are on duty, or within the law
87 enforcement agency's jurisdiction;
88 (7) Any state probation or parole officer, including
89 supervisors and members of the parole board;
90 (8) Any corporate security advisor meeting the
91 definition and fulfilling the requirements of the
92 regulations established by the department of public safety
93 under section 590.750;
94 (9) Any coroner, deputy coroner, medical examiner, or
95 assistant medical examiner;
96 (10) Any municipal or county prosecuting attorney or
97 assistant prosecuting attorney; circuit attorney or
98 assistant circuit attorney; municipal, associate, or circuit
99 judge; or any person appointed by a court to be a special
100 prosecutor who has completed the firearms safety training
101 course required under subsection 2 of section 571.111;
102 (11) Any member of a fire department or fire
103 protection district who is employed on a full-time basis as
104 a fire investigator and who has a valid concealed carry
105 endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a valid
106 concealed carry permit under section 571.111 when such uses
107 are reasonably associated with or are necessary to the
108 fulfillment of such person's official duties; and
109 (12) Upon the written approval of the governing body
110 of a fire department or fire protection district, any paid
111 fire department or fire protection district member who is
112 employed on a full-time basis and who has a valid concealed

SB 908 8
113 carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a
114 valid concealed carry permit, when such uses are reasonably
115 associated with or are necessary to the fulfillment of such
116 person's official duties.
117 3. Subdivisions (1), (5), (8), and (10) of subsection
118 1 of this section do not apply when the actor is
119 transporting such weapons in a nonfunctioning state or in an
120 unloaded state when ammunition is not readily accessible or
121 when such weapons are not readily accessible. Subdivision
122 (1) of subsection 1 of this section does not apply to any
123 person [nineteen] eighteen years of age or older [or
124 eighteen years of age or older and a member of the United
125 States Armed Forces, or honorably discharged from the United
126 States Armed Forces,] transporting a concealable firearm in
127 the passenger compartment of a motor vehicle, so long as
128 such concealable firearm is otherwise lawfully possessed,
129 nor when the actor is also in possession of an exposed
130 firearm or projectile weapon for the lawful pursuit of game,
131 or is in his or her dwelling unit or upon premises over
132 which the actor has possession, authority or control, or is
133 traveling in a continuous journey peaceably through this
134 state. Subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of this section
135 does not apply if the firearm is otherwise lawfully
136 possessed by a person while traversing school premises for
137 the purposes of transporting a student to or from school, or
138 possessed by an adult for the purposes of facilitation of a
139 school-sanctioned firearm-related event or club event.
140 4. Subdivisions (1), (8), and (10) of subsection 1 of
141 this section shall not apply to any person who has a valid
142 concealed carry permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101
143 to 571.121, a valid concealed carry endorsement issued
144 before August 28, 2013, or a valid permit or endorsement to

SB 908 9
145 carry concealed firearms issued by another state or
146 political subdivision of another state.
147 5. Subdivisions (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and
148 (10) of subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to
149 persons who are engaged in a lawful act of defense pursuant
150 to section 563.031.
151 6. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to
152 the contrary, the state shall not prohibit any state
153 employee from having a firearm in the employee's vehicle on
154 the state's property provided that the vehicle is locked and
155 the firearm is not visible. This subsection shall only
156 apply to the state as an employer when the state employee's
157 vehicle is on property owned or leased by the state and the
158 state employee is conducting activities within the scope of
159 his or her employment. For the purposes of this subsection,
160 "state employee" means an employee of the executive,
161 legislative, or judicial branch of the government of the
162 state of Missouri.
163 7. (1) Subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of this
164 section shall not apply to a person who is a school officer
165 commissioned by the district school board under section
166 162.215 or who is a school protection officer, as described
167 under section 160.665.
168 (2) Nothing in this section shall make it unlawful for
169 a student to actually participate in school-sanctioned gun
170 safety courses, student military or ROTC courses, or other
171 school-sponsored or club-sponsored firearm-related events,
172 provided the student does not carry a firearm or other
173 weapon readily capable of lethal use into any school, onto
174 any school bus, or onto the premises of any other function
175 or activity sponsored or sanctioned by school officials or
176 the district school board.

SB 908 10
177 8. A person who commits the crime of unlawful use of
178 weapons under:
179 (1) Subdivision (2), (3), (4), or (11) of subsection 1
180 of this section shall be guilty of a class E felony;
181 (2) Subdivision (1), (6), (7), or (8) of subsection 1
182 of this section shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor,
183 except when a concealed weapon is carried onto any private
184 property whose owner has posted the premises as being off-
185 limits to concealed firearms by means of one or more signs
186 displayed in a conspicuous place of a minimum size of eleven
187 inches by fourteen inches with the writing thereon in
188 letters of not less than one inch, in which case the
189 penalties of subsection 2 of section 571.107 shall apply;
190 (3) Subdivision (5) or (10) of subsection 1 of this
191 section shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the
192 firearm is unloaded and a class E felony if the firearm is
193 loaded;
194 (4) Subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of this section
195 shall be guilty of a class B felony, except that if the
196 violation of subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of this section
197 results in injury or death to another person, it is a class
198 A felony.
199 9. Violations of subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of
200 this section shall be punished as follows:
201 (1) For the first violation a person shall be
202 sentenced to the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for
203 a class B felony;
204 (2) For any violation by a prior offender as defined
205 in section 558.016, a person shall be sentenced to the
206 maximum authorized term of imprisonment for a class B felony
207 without the possibility of parole, probation or conditional
208 release for a term of ten years;

SB 908 11
209 (3) For any violation by a persistent offender as
210 defined in section 558.016, a person shall be sentenced to
211 the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for a class B
212 felony without the possibility of parole, probation, or
213 conditional release;
214 (4) For any violation which results in injury or death
215 to another person, a person shall be sentenced to an
216 authorized disposition for a class A felony.
217 10. Any person knowingly aiding or abetting any other
218 person in the violation of subdivision (9) of subsection 1
219 of this section shall be subject to the same penalty as that
220 prescribed by this section for violations by other persons.
221 11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
222 person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a felony
223 violation of subsection 1 of this section shall receive a
224 suspended imposition of sentence if such person has
225 previously received a suspended imposition of sentence for
226 any other firearms- or weapons-related felony offense.
227 12. As used in this section "qualified retired peace
228 officer" means an individual who:
229 (1) Retired in good standing from service with a
230 public agency as a peace officer, other than for reasons of
231 mental instability;
232 (2) Before such retirement, was authorized by law to
233 engage in or supervise the prevention, detection,
234 investigation, or prosecution of, or the incarceration of
235 any person for, any violation of law, and had statutory
236 powers of arrest;
237 (3) Before such retirement, was regularly employed as
238 a peace officer for an aggregate of fifteen years or more,
239 or retired from service with such agency, after completing

SB 908 12
240 any applicable probationary period of such service, due to a
241 service-connected disability, as determined by such agency;
242 (4) Has a nonforfeitable right to benefits under the
243 retirement plan of the agency if such a plan is available;
244 (5) During the most recent twelve-month period, has
245 met, at the expense of the individual, the standards for
246 training and qualification for active peace officers to
247 carry firearms;
248 (6) Is not under the influence of alcohol or another
249 intoxicating or hallucinatory drug or substance; and
250 (7) Is not prohibited by federal law from receiving a
251 firearm.
252 13. The identification required by subdivision (1) of
253 subsection 2 of this section is:
254 (1) A photographic identification issued by the agency
255 from which the individual retired from service as a peace
256 officer that indicates that the individual has, not less
257 recently than one year before the date the individual is
258 carrying the concealed firearm, been tested or otherwise
259 found by the agency to meet the standards established by the
260 agency for training and qualification for active peace
261 officers to carry a firearm of the same type as the
262 concealed firearm; or
263 (2) A photographic identification issued by the agency
264 from which the individual retired from service as a peace
265 officer; and
266 (3) A certification issued by the state in which the
267 individual resides that indicates that the individual has,
268 not less recently than one year before the date the
269 individual is carrying the concealed firearm, been tested or
270 otherwise found by the state to meet the standards
271 established by the state for training and qualification for

SB 908 13
272 active peace officers to carry a firearm of the same type as
273 the concealed firearm.
1 571.101. 1. All applicants for concealed carry
2 permits issued pursuant to subsection 7 of this section must
3 satisfy the requirements of sections 571.101 to 571.121. If
4 the said applicant can show qualification as provided by
5 sections 571.101 to 571.121, the county or city sheriff
6 shall issue a concealed carry permit authorizing the
7 carrying of a concealed firearm on or about the applicant's
8 person or within a vehicle. A concealed carry permit shall
9 be valid from the date of issuance or renewal until five
10 years from the last day of the month in which the permit was
11 issued or renewed. The concealed carry permit is valid
12 throughout this state. Although the permit is considered
13 valid in the state, a person who fails to renew his or her
14 permit within five years from the date of issuance or
15 renewal shall not be eligible for an exception to a National
16 Instant Criminal Background Check under federal regulations
17 currently codified under 27 CFR 478.102(d), relating to the
18 transfer, sale, or delivery of firearms from licensed
19 dealers. A concealed carry endorsement issued prior to
20 August 28, 2013, shall continue from the date of issuance or
21 renewal until three years from the last day of the month in
22 which the endorsement was issued or renewed to authorize the
23 carrying of a concealed firearm on or about the applicant's
24 person or within a vehicle in the same manner as a concealed
25 carry permit issued under subsection 7 of this section on or
26 after August 28, 2013.
27 2. A concealed carry permit issued pursuant to
28 subsection 7 of this section shall be issued by the sheriff
29 or his or her designee of the county or city in which the
30 applicant resides, if the applicant:

SB 908 14
31 (1) Is at least [nineteen] eighteen years of age, is a
32 citizen or permanent resident of the United States and
33 either:
34 (a) Has assumed residency in this state; or
35 (b) Is a member of the Armed Forces stationed in
36 Missouri, or the spouse of such member of the military;
37 (2) [Is at least nineteen years of age, or is at least
38 eighteen years of age and a member of the United States
39 Armed Forces or honorably discharged from the United States
40 Armed Forces, and is a citizen of the United States and
41 either:
42 (a) Has assumed residency in this state;
43 (b) Is a member of the Armed Forces stationed in
44 Missouri; or
45 (c) The spouse of such member of the military
46 stationed in Missouri and nineteen years of age;
47 (3)] Has not pled guilty to or entered a plea of nolo
48 contendere or been convicted of a crime punishable by
49 imprisonment for a term exceeding one year under the laws of
50 any state or of the United States other than a crime
51 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of any state and
52 punishable by a term of imprisonment of two years or less
53 that does not involve an explosive weapon, firearm, firearm
54 silencer or gas gun;
55 [(4)] (3) Has not been convicted of, pled guilty to or
56 entered a plea of nolo contendere to one or more misdemeanor
57 offenses involving crimes of violence within a five-year
58 period immediately preceding application for a concealed
59 carry permit or if the applicant has not been convicted of
60 two or more misdemeanor offenses involving driving while
61 under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs or the
62 possession or abuse of a controlled substance within a five-

SB 908 15
63 year period immediately preceding application for a
64 concealed carry permit;
65 [(5)] (4) Is not a fugitive from justice or currently
66 charged in an information or indictment with the commission
67 of a crime punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding
68 one year under the laws of any state of the United States
69 other than a crime classified as a misdemeanor under the
70 laws of any state and punishable by a term of imprisonment
71 of two years or less that does not involve an explosive
72 weapon, firearm, firearm silencer, or gas gun;
73 [(6)] (5) Has not been discharged under dishonorable
74 conditions from the United States Armed Forces;
75 [(7)] (6) Has not engaged in a pattern of behavior,
76 documented in public or closed records, that causes the
77 sheriff to have a reasonable belief that the applicant
78 presents a danger to himself or others;
79 [(8)] (7) Is not adjudged mentally incompetent at the
80 time of application or for five years prior to application,
81 or has not been committed to a mental health facility, as
82 defined in section 632.005, or a similar institution located
83 in another state following a hearing at which the defendant
84 was represented by counsel or a representative;
85 [(9)] (8) Submits a completed application for a permit
86 as described in subsection 3 of this section;
87 [(10)] (9) Submits an affidavit attesting that the
88 applicant complies with the concealed carry safety training
89 requirement pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 of section
90 571.111;
91 [(11)] (10) Is not the respondent of a valid full order
92 of protection which is still in effect;
93 [(12)] (11) Is not otherwise prohibited from possessing
94 a firearm under section 571.070 or 18 U.S.C. Section 922(g).

SB 908 16
95 3. The application for a concealed carry permit issued
96 by the sheriff of the county of the applicant's residence
97 shall contain only the following information:
98 (1) The applicant's name, address, telephone number,
99 gender, date and place of birth, and, if the applicant is
100 not a United States citizen, the applicant's country of
101 citizenship and any alien or admission number issued by the
102 Federal Bureau of Customs and Immigration Enforcement or any
103 successor agency;
104 (2) An affirmation that the applicant has assumed
105 residency in Missouri or is a member of the Armed Forces
106 stationed in Missouri or the spouse of such a member of the
107 Armed Forces and is a citizen or permanent resident of the
108 United States;
109 (3) An affirmation that the applicant is at least
110 [nineteen] eighteen years of age [or is eighteen years of
111 age or older and a member of the United States Armed Forces
112 or honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces];
113 (4) An affirmation that the applicant has not pled
114 guilty to or been convicted of a crime punishable by
115 imprisonment for a term exceeding one year under the laws of
116 any state or of the United States other than a crime
117 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of any state and
118 punishable by a term of imprisonment of two years or less
119 that does not involve an explosive weapon, firearm, firearm
120 silencer, or gas gun;
121 (5) An affirmation that the applicant has not been
122 convicted of, pled guilty to, or entered a plea of nolo
123 contendere to one or more misdemeanor offenses involving
124 crimes of violence within a five-year period immediately
125 preceding application for a permit or if the applicant has
126 not been convicted of two or more misdemeanor offenses

SB 908 17
127 involving driving while under the influence of intoxicating
128 liquor or drugs or the possession or abuse of a controlled
129 substance within a five-year period immediately preceding
130 application for a permit;
131 (6) An affirmation that the applicant is not a
132 fugitive from justice or currently charged in an information
133 or indictment with the commission of a crime punishable by
134 imprisonment for a term exceeding one year under the laws of
135 any state or of the United States other than a crime
136 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of any state and
137 punishable by a term of imprisonment of two years or less
138 that does not involve an explosive weapon, firearm, firearm
139 silencer or gas gun;
140 (7) An affirmation that the applicant has not been
141 discharged under dishonorable conditions from the United
142 States Armed Forces;
143 (8) An affirmation that the applicant is not adjudged
144 mentally incompetent at the time of application or for five
145 years prior to application, or has not been committed to a
146 mental health facility, as defined in section 632.005, or a
147 similar institution located in another state, except that a
148 person whose release or discharge from a facility in this
149 state pursuant to chapter 632, or a similar discharge from a
150 facility in another state, occurred more than five years ago
151 without subsequent recommitment may apply;
152 (9) An affirmation that the applicant has received
153 firearms safety training that meets the standards of
154 applicant firearms safety training defined in subsection 1
155 or 2 of section 571.111;
156 (10) An affirmation that the applicant, to the
157 applicant's best knowledge and belief, is not the respondent
158 of a valid full order of protection which is still in effect;

SB 908 18
159 (11) A conspicuous warning that false statements made
160 by the applicant will result in prosecution for perjury
161 pursuant to the laws of the state of Missouri; and
162 (12) A government-issued photo identification. This
163 photograph shall not be included on the permit and shall
164 only be used to verify the person's identity for permit
165 renewal, or for the issuance of a new permit due to change
166 of address, or for a lost or destroyed permit.
167 4. An application for a concealed carry permit shall
168 be made to the sheriff of the county or any city not within
169 a county in which the applicant resides. An application
170 shall be filed in writing, signed under oath and under the
171 penalties of perjury, and shall state whether the applicant
172 complies with each of the requirements specified in
173 subsection 2 of this section. In addition to the completed
174 application, the applicant for a concealed carry permit must
175 also submit the following:
176 (1) A photocopy of a firearms safety training
177 certificate of completion or other evidence of completion of
178 a firearms safety training course that meets the standards
179 established in subsection 1 or 2 of section 571.111; and
180 (2) A nonrefundable permit fee as provided by
181 subsection 11 or 12 of this section.
182 5. (1) Before an application for a concealed carry
183 permit is approved, the sheriff shall make only such
184 inquiries as he or she deems necessary into the accuracy of
185 the statements made in the application. The sheriff may
186 require that the applicant display a Missouri driver's
187 license or nondriver's license or military identification
188 and orders showing the person being stationed in Missouri.
189 In order to determine the applicant's suitability for a
190 concealed carry permit, the applicant shall be

SB 908 19
191 fingerprinted. No other biometric data shall be collected
192 from the applicant. The sheriff shall conduct an inquiry of
193 the National Instant Criminal Background Check System within
194 three working days after submission of the properly
195 completed application for a concealed carry permit. If no
196 disqualifying record is identified by these checks at the
197 state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded to the
198 Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal
199 history record check. Upon receipt of the completed report
200 from the National Instant Criminal Background Check System
201 and the response from the Federal Bureau of Investigation
202 national criminal history record check, the sheriff shall
203 examine the results and, if no disqualifying information is
204 identified, shall issue a concealed carry permit within
205 three working days.
206 (2) In the event the report from the National Instant
207 Criminal Background Check System and the response from the
208 Federal Bureau of Investigation national criminal history
209 record check prescribed by subdivision (1) of this
210 subsection are not completed within forty-five calendar days
211 and no disqualifying information concerning the applicant
212 has otherwise come to the sheriff's attention, the sheriff
213 shall issue a provisional permit, clearly designated on the
214 certificate as such, which the applicant shall sign in the
215 presence of the sheriff or the sheriff's designee. This
216 permit, when carried with a valid Missouri driver's or
217 nondriver's license or a valid military identification,
218 shall permit the applicant to exercise the same rights in
219 accordance with the same conditions as pertain to a
220 concealed carry permit issued under this section, provided
221 that it shall not serve as an alternative to an national
222 instant criminal background check required by 18 U.S.C.

SB 908 20
223 Section 922(t). The provisional permit shall remain valid
224 until such time as the sheriff either issues or denies the
225 certificate of qualification under subsection 6 or 7 of this
226 section. The sheriff shall revoke a provisional permit
227 issued under this subsection within twenty-four hours of
228 receipt of any report that identifies a disqualifying
229 record, and shall notify the concealed carry permit system
230 established under subsection 5 of section 650.350. The
231 revocation of a provisional permit issued under this section
232 shall be proscribed in a manner consistent to the denial and
233 review of an application under subsection 6 of this section.
234 6. The sheriff may refuse to approve an application
235 for a concealed carry permit if he or she determines that
236 any of the requirements specified in subsection 2 of this
237 section have not been met, or if he or she has a substantial
238 and demonstrable reason to believe that the applicant has
239 rendered a false statement regarding any of the provisions
240 of sections 571.101 to 571.121. If the applicant is found
241 to be ineligible, the sheriff is required to deny the
242 application, and notify the applicant in writing, stating
243 the grounds for denial and informing the applicant of the
244 right to submit, within thirty days, any additional
245 documentation relating to the grounds of the denial. Upon
246 receiving any additional documentation, the sheriff shall
247 reconsider his or her decision and inform the applicant
248 within thirty days of the result of the reconsideration.
249 The applicant shall further be informed in writing of the
250 right to appeal the denial pursuant to subsections 2, 3, 4,
251 and 5 of section 571.114. After two additional reviews and
252 denials by the sheriff, the person submitting the
253 application shall appeal the denial pursuant to subsections
254 2, 3, 4, and 5 of section 571.114.

SB 908 21
255 7. If the application is approved, the sheriff shall
256 issue a concealed carry permit to the applicant within a
257 period not to exceed three working days after his or her
258 approval of the application. The applicant shall sign the
259 concealed carry permit in the presence of the sheriff or his
260 or her designee.
261 8. The concealed carry permit shall specify only the
262 following information:
263 (1) Name, address, date of birth, gender, height,
264 weight, color of hair, color of eyes, and signature of the
265 permit holder;
266 (2) The signature of the sheriff issuing the permit;
267 (3) The date of issuance; and
268 (4) The expiration date.
269 The permit shall be no larger than two and one-eighth inches
270 wide by three and three-eighths inches long and shall be of
271 a uniform style prescribed by the department of public
272 safety. The permit shall also be assigned a concealed carry
273 permit system county code and shall be stored in sequential
274 number.
275 9. (1) The sheriff shall keep a record of all
276 applications for a concealed carry permit or a provisional
277 permit and his or her action thereon. Any record of an
278 application that is incomplete or denied for any reason
279 shall be kept for a period not to exceed one year. Any
280 record of an application that was approved shall be kept for
281 a period of one year after the expiration and nonrenewal of
282 the permit.
283 (2) The sheriff shall report the issuance of a
284 concealed carry permit or provisional permit to the
285 concealed carry permit system. All information on any such

SB 908 22
286 permit that is protected information on any driver's or
287 nondriver's license shall have the same personal protection
288 for purposes of sections 571.101 to 571.121. An applicant's
289 status as a holder of a concealed carry permit, provisional
290 permit, or a concealed carry endorsement issued prior to
291 August 28, 2013, shall not be public information and shall
292 be considered personal protected information. Information
293 retained in the concealed carry permit system under this
294 subsection shall not be distributed to any federal, state,
295 or private entities and shall only be made available for a
296 single entry query of an individual in the event the
297 individual is a subject of interest in an active criminal
298 investigation or is arrested for a crime. A sheriff may
299 access the concealed carry permit system for administrative
300 purposes to issue a permit, verify the accuracy of permit
301 holder information, change the name or address of a permit
302 holder, suspend or revoke a permit, cancel an expired
303 permit, or cancel a permit upon receipt of a certified death
304 certificate for the permit holder. Any person who violates
305 the provisions of this subdivision by disclosing protected
306 information shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
307 10. Information regarding any holder of a concealed
308 carry permit, or a concealed carry endorsement issued prior
309 to August 28, 2013, is a closed record. No bulk download or
310 batch data shall be distributed to any federal, state, or
311 private entity, except to MoSMART or a designee thereof.
312 Any state agency that has retained any documents or records,
313 including fingerprint records provided by an applicant for a
314 concealed carry endorsement prior to August 28, 2013, shall
315 destroy such documents or records, upon successful issuance
316 of a permit.

SB 908 23
317 11. For processing an application for a concealed
318 carry permit pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, the
319 sheriff in each county shall charge a nonrefundable fee not
320 to exceed one hundred dollars which shall be paid to the
321 treasury of the county to the credit of the sheriff's
322 revolving fund. This fee shall include the cost to
323 reimburse the Missouri state highway patrol for the costs of
324 fingerprinting and criminal background checks. An
325 additional fee shall be added to each credit card, debit
326 card, or other electronic transaction equal to the charge
327 paid by the state or the applicant for the use of the credit
328 card, debit card, or other electronic payment method by the
329 applicant.
330 12. For processing a renewal for a concealed carry
331 permit pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, the sheriff
332 in each county shall charge a nonrefundable fee not to
333 exceed fifty dollars which shall be paid to the treasury of
334 the county to the credit of the sheriff's revolving fund.
335 13. For the purposes of sections 571.101 to 571.121,
336 the term "sheriff" shall include the sheriff of any county
337 or city not within a county or his or her designee and in
338 counties of the first classification the sheriff may
339 designate the chief of police of any city, town, or
340 municipality within such county.
341 14. For the purposes of this chapter, "concealed carry
342 permit" shall include any concealed carry endorsement issued
343 by the department of revenue before January 1, 2014, and any
344 concealed carry document issued by any sheriff or under the
345 authority of any sheriff after December 31, 2013.
1 571.117. 1. Any person who has knowledge that another
2 person, who was issued a concealed carry permit pursuant to
3 sections 571.101 to 571.121, or concealed carry endorsement

SB 908 24
4 prior to August 28, 2013, never was or no longer is eligible
5 for such permit or endorsement under the criteria
6 established in sections 571.101 to 571.121 may file a
7 petition with the clerk of the small claims court to revoke
8 that person's concealed carry permit or endorsement. The
9 petition shall be in a form substantially similar to the
10 petition for revocation of concealed carry permit or
11 endorsement provided in this section. Appeal forms shall be
12 provided by the clerk of the small claims court free of
13 charge to any person:
14 SMALL CLAIMS COURT
15 In the Circuit Court of _________ , Missouri
16 ______, PLAINTIFF
17 )
18 )
19 vs. ) Case Number ______
20 )
21 ______, DEFENDANT,
22 Carry Permit or Endorsement Holder
23 ______, DEFENDANT,
24 Sheriff of Issuance
25 PETITION FOR REVOCATION OF A
26 CONCEALED CARRY PERMIT OR CONCEALED CARRY
27 ENDORSEMENT
28 Plaintiff states to the court that the
29 defendant, ______, has a concealed carry permit

SB 908 25
30 issued pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121,
31 RSMo, or a concealed carry endorsement issued
32 prior to August 28, 2013, and that the
33 defendant's concealed carry permit or concealed
34 carry endorsement should now be revoked because
35 the defendant either never was or no longer is
36 eligible for such a permit or endorsement
37 pursuant to the provisions of sections 571.101
38 to 571.121, RSMo, specifically plaintiff states
39 that defendant, ______, never was or no longer
40 is eligible for such permit or endorsement for
41 one or more of the following reasons:
42 (CHECK BELOW EACH REASON THAT APPLIES TO THIS
43 DEFENDANT)
44 □ Defendant is not at least [nineteen] eighteen
45 years of age [or at least eighteen years of
46 age and a member of the United States Armed
47 Forces or honorably discharged from the
48 United States Armed Forces].
49 □ Defendant is not a citizen or permanent
50 resident of the United States.
51 □ Defendant had not resided in this state prior
52 to issuance of the permit and does not
53 qualify as a military member or spouse of a
54 military member stationed in Missouri.
55 □ Defendant has pled guilty to or been
56 convicted of a crime punishable by
57 imprisonment for a term exceeding two years
58 under the laws of any state or of the United
59 States other than a crime classified as a
60 misdemeanor under the laws of any state and
61 punishable by a term of imprisonment of one
62 year or less that does not involve an
63 explosive weapon, firearm, firearm silencer,
64 or gas gun.

SB 908 26
65 □ Defendant has been convicted of, pled guilty
66 to or entered a plea of nolo contendere to
67 one or more misdemeanor offenses involving
68 crimes of violence within a five-year period
69 immediately preceding application for a
70 concealed carry permit issued pursuant to
71 sections 571.101 to 571.121, RSMo, or a
72 concealed carry endorsement issued prior to
73 August 28, 2013, or if the applicant has been
74 convicted of two or more misdemeanor offenses
75 involving driving while under the influence
76 of intoxicating liquor or drugs or the
77 possession or abuse of a controlled substance
78 within a five-year period immediately
79 preceding application for a concealed carry
80 permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101 to
81 571.121, RSMo, or a concealed carry
82 endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013.
83 □ Defendant is a fugitive from justice or
84 currently charged in an information or
85 indictment with the commission of a crime
86 punishable by imprisonment for a term
87 exceeding one year under the laws of any
88 state of the United States other than a crime
89 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of
90 any state and punishable by a term of
91 imprisonment of two years or less that does
92 not involve an explosive weapon, firearm,
93 firearm silencer, or gas gun.
94 □ Defendant has been discharged under
95 dishonorable conditions from the United
96 States Armed Forces.
97 □ Defendant is reasonably believed by the
98 sheriff to be a danger to self or others
99 based on previous, documented pattern.
100 □ Defendant is adjudged mentally incompetent at
101 the time of application or for five years

SB 908 27
102 prior to application, or has been committed
103 to a mental health facility, as defined in
104 section 632.005, RSMo, or a similar
105 institution located in another state, except
106 that a person whose release or discharge from
107 a facility in this state pursuant to chapter
108 632, RSMo, or a similar discharge from a
109 facility in another state, occurred more than
110 five years ago without subsequent
111 recommitment may apply.
112 □ Defendant failed to submit a completed
113 application for a concealed carry permit
114 issued pursuant to sections 571.101 to
115 571.121, RSMo, or a concealed carry
116 endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013.
117 □ Defendant failed to submit to or failed to
118 clear the required background check. (Note:
119 This does not apply if the defendant has
120 submitted to a background check and been
121 issued a provisional permit pursuant to
122 subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of section
123 571.101, and the results of the background
124 check are still pending.)
125 □ Defendant failed to submit an affidavit
126 attesting that the applicant complies with
127 the concealed carry safety training
128 requirement pursuant to subsection 1 of
129 section 571.111, RSMo.
130 □ Defendant is otherwise disqualified from
131 possessing a firearm pursuant to 18 U.S.C.
132 Section 922(g) or section 571.070, RSMo,
133 because (specify reason):
134 The plaintiff subject to penalty for perjury
135 states that the information contained in this
136 petition is true and correct to the best of the

SB 908 28
137 plaintiff's knowledge, is reasonably based upon
138 the petitioner's personal knowledge and is not
139 primarily intended to harass the
140 defendant/respondent named herein.
141 __________________ , PLAINTIFF
142 2. If at the hearing the plaintiff shows that the
143 defendant was not eligible for the concealed carry permit
144 issued pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, or a
145 concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013,
146 at the time of issuance or renewal or is no longer eligible
147 for a concealed carry permit or the concealed carry
148 endorsement, the court shall issue an appropriate order to
149 cause the revocation of the concealed carry permit and, if
150 applicable, the concealed carry endorsement. Costs shall
151 not be assessed against the sheriff.
152 3. The finder of fact, in any action brought against a
153 permit or endorsement holder pursuant to subsection 1 of
154 this section, shall make findings of fact and the court
155 shall make conclusions of law addressing the issues at
156 dispute. If it is determined that the plaintiff in such an
157 action acted without justification or with malice or
158 primarily with an intent to harass the permit or endorsement
159 holder or that there was no reasonable basis to bring the
160 action, the court shall order the plaintiff to pay the
161 defendant/respondent all reasonable costs incurred in
162 defending the action including, but not limited to,
163 attorney's fees, deposition costs, and lost wages. Once the
164 court determines that the plaintiff is liable to the
165 defendant/respondent for costs and fees, the extent and type
166 of fees and costs to be awarded should be liberally
167 calculated in defendant/respondent's favor. Notwithstanding

SB 908 29
168 any other provision of law, reasonable attorney's fees shall
169 be presumed to be at least one hundred fifty dollars per
170 hour.
171 4. Any person aggrieved by any final judgment rendered
172 by a small claims court in a petition for revocation of a
173 concealed carry permit or concealed carry endorsement may
174 have a right to trial de novo as provided in sections
175 512.180 to 512.320.
176 5. The office of the county sheriff or any employee or
177 agent of the county sheriff shall not be liable for damages
178 in any civil action arising from alleged wrongful or
179 improper granting, renewing, or failure to revoke a
180 concealed carry permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101
181 to 571.121, or a certificate of qualification for a
182 concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013,
183 so long as the sheriff acted in good faith.
1 571.205. 1. Upon request and payment of the required
2 fee, the sheriff shall issue a concealed carry permit that
3 is valid through the state of Missouri for the lifetime of
4 the permit holder to a Missouri resident who meets the
5 requirements of sections 571.205 to 571.230, known as a
6 Missouri lifetime concealed carry permit. A person may also
7 request, and the sheriff shall issue upon payment of the
8 required fee, a concealed carry permit that is valid through
9 the state of Missouri for a period of either ten years or
10 twenty-five years from the date of issuance or renewal to a
11 Missouri resident who meets the requirements of sections
12 571.205 to 571.230. Such permit shall be known as a
13 Missouri extended concealed carry permit. A person issued a
14 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit shall
15 be required to comply with the provisions of sections
16 571.205 to 571.230. If the applicant can show qualification

SB 908 30
17 as provided by sections 571.205 to 571.230, the sheriff
18 shall issue a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
19 permit authorizing the carrying of a concealed firearm on or
20 about the applicant's person or within a vehicle.
21 2. A Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
22 permit shall be suspended if the permit holder becomes a
23 resident of another state. The permit may be reactivated
24 upon reestablishment of Missouri residency if the applicant
25 meets the requirements of sections 571.205 to 571.230, and
26 upon successful completion of a name-based inquiry of the
27 National Instant Background Check System.
28 3. A Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
29 permit shall be issued by the sheriff or his or her designee
30 of the county or city in which the applicant resides, if the
31 applicant:
32 (1) Is at least [nineteen] eighteen years of age, is a
33 citizen or permanent resident of the United States, and has
34 assumed residency in this state[, or is at least eighteen
35 years of age and a member of the United States Armed Forces
36 or honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces,
37 and is a citizen of the United States and has assumed
38 residency in this state];
39 (2) Has not pled guilty to or entered a plea of nolo
40 contendere or been convicted of a crime punishable by
41 imprisonment for a term exceeding one year under the laws of
42 any state or of the United States, other than a crime
43 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of any state and
44 punishable by a term of imprisonment of two years or less
45 that does not involve an explosive weapon, firearm, firearm
46 silencer, or gas gun;

SB 908 31
47 (3) Has not been convicted of, pled guilty to or
48 entered a plea of nolo contendere to one or more misdemeanor
49 offenses involving crimes of violence within a five-year
50 period immediately preceding application for a Missouri
51 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit or if the
52 applicant has not been convicted of two or more misdemeanor
53 offenses involving driving while under the influence of
54 intoxicating liquor or drugs or the possession or abuse of a
55 controlled substance within a five-year period immediately
56 preceding application for a Missouri lifetime or extended
57 concealed carry permit;
58 (4) Is not a fugitive from justice or currently
59 charged in an information or indictment with the commission
60 of a crime punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding
61 one year under the laws of any state of the United States,
62 other than a crime classified as a misdemeanor under the
63 laws of any state and punishable by a term of imprisonment
64 of two years or less that does not involve an explosive
65 weapon, firearm, firearm silencer, or gas gun;
66 (5) Has not been discharged under dishonorable
67 conditions from the United States Armed Forces;
68 (6) Has not engaged in a pattern of behavior,
69 documented in public or closed records, that causes the
70 sheriff to have a reasonable belief that the applicant
71 presents a danger to himself or herself or others;
72 (7) Is not adjudged mentally incompetent at the time
73 of application or for five years prior to application, or
74 has not been committed to a mental health facility, as
75 defined in section 632.005, or a similar institution located
76 in another state following a hearing at which the defendant
77 was represented by counsel or a representative;

SB 908 32
78 (8) Submits a completed application for a permit as
79 described in subsection 4 of this section;
80 (9) Submits an affidavit attesting that the applicant
81 complies with the concealed carry safety training
82 requirement under subsections 1 and 2 of section 571.111;
83 (10) Is not the respondent of a valid full order of
84 protection which is still in effect;
85 (11) Is not otherwise prohibited from possessing a
86 firearm under section 571.070 or 18 U.S.C. Section 922(g).
87 4. The application for a Missouri lifetime or extended
88 concealed carry permit issued by the sheriff of the county
89 of the applicant's residence shall contain only the
90 following information:
91 (1) The applicant's name, address, telephone number,
92 gender, date and place of birth, and, if the applicant is
93 not a United States citizen, the applicant's country of
94 citizenship and any alien or admission number issued by the
95 United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement or any
96 successor agency;
97 (2) An affirmation that the applicant has assumed
98 residency in Missouri and is a citizen or permanent resident
99 of the United States;
100 (3) An affirmation that the applicant is at least
101 [nineteen] eighteen years of age [or is eighteen years of
102 age or older and a member of the United States Armed Forces
103 or honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces];
104 (4) An affirmation that the applicant has not pled
105 guilty to or been convicted of a crime punishable by
106 imprisonment for a term exceeding one year under the laws of
107 any state or of the United States other than a crime
108 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of any state and

SB 908 33
109 punishable by a term of imprisonment of two years or less
110 that does not involve an explosive weapon, firearm, firearm
111 silencer, or gas gun;
112 (5) An affirmation that the applicant has not been
113 convicted of, pled guilty to, or entered a plea of nolo
114 contendere to one or more misdemeanor offenses involving
115 crimes of violence within a five-year period immediately
116 preceding application for a permit or that the applicant has
117 not been convicted of two or more misdemeanor offenses
118 involving driving while under the influence of intoxicating
119 liquor or drugs or the possession or abuse of a controlled
120 substance within a five-year period immediately preceding
121 application for a permit;
122 (6) An affirmation that the applicant is not a
123 fugitive from justice or currently charged in an information
124 or indictment with the commission of a crime punishable by
125 imprisonment for a term exceeding one year under the laws of
126 any state or of the United States other than a crime
127 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of any state and
128 punishable by a term of imprisonment of two years or less
129 that does not involve an explosive weapon, firearm, firearm
130 silencer, or gas gun;
131 (7) An affirmation that the applicant has not been
132 discharged under dishonorable conditions from the United
133 States Armed Forces;
134 (8) An affirmation that the applicant is not adjudged
135 mentally incompetent at the time of application or for five
136 years prior to application, or has not been committed to a
137 mental health facility, as defined in section 632.005, or a
138 similar institution located in another state, except that a
139 person whose release or discharge from a facility in this

SB 908 34
140 state under chapter 632, or a similar discharge from a
141 facility in another state, occurred more than five years ago
142 without subsequent recommitment may apply;
143 (9) An affirmation that the applicant has received
144 firearms safety training that meets the standards of
145 applicant firearms safety training defined in subsection 1
146 or 2 of section 571.111;
147 (10) An affirmation that the applicant, to the
148 applicant's best knowledge and belief, is not the respondent
149 of a valid full order of protection which is still in effect;
150 (11) A conspicuous warning that false statements made
151 by the applicant will result in prosecution for perjury
152 under the laws of the state of Missouri; and
153 (12) A government-issued photo identification. This
154 photograph shall not be included on the permit and shall
155 only be used to verify the person's identity for the
156 issuance of a new permit, issuance of a new permit due to
157 change of name or address, renewal of an extended permit, or
158 for a lost or destroyed permit, or reactivation under
159 subsection 2 of this section.
160 5. An application for a Missouri lifetime or extended
161 concealed carry permit shall be made to the sheriff of the
162 county in which the applicant resides. An application shall
163 be filed in writing, signed under oath and under the
164 penalties of perjury, and shall state whether the applicant
165 complies with each of the requirements specified in
166 subsection 3 of this section. In addition to the completed
167 application, the applicant for a Missouri lifetime or
168 extended concealed carry permit shall also submit the
169 following:

SB 908 35
170 (1) A photocopy of a firearms safety training
171 certificate of completion or other evidence of completion of
172 a firearms safety training course that meets the standards
173 established in subsection 1 or 2 of section 571.111; and
174 (2) A nonrefundable permit fee as provided by
175 subsection 12 of this section.
176 6. (1) Before an application for a Missouri lifetime
177 or extended concealed carry permit is approved, the sheriff
178 shall make only such inquiries as he or she deems necessary
179 into the accuracy of the statements made in the
180 application. The sheriff may require that the applicant
181 display a Missouri driver's license or nondriver's license
182 or military identification. No biometric data shall be
183 collected from the applicant. The sheriff shall conduct an
184 inquiry of the National Instant Criminal Background Check
185 System within three working days after submission of the
186 properly completed application for a Missouri lifetime or
187 extended concealed carry permit. Upon receipt of the
188 completed report from the National Instant Criminal
189 Background Check System, the sheriff shall examine the
190 results and, if no disqualifying information is identified,
191 shall issue a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
192 permit within three working days.
193 (2) In the event the report from the National Instant
194 Criminal Background Check System and the response from the
195 Federal Bureau of Investigation national criminal history
196 record check prescribed by subdivision (1) of this
197 subsection are not completed within forty-five calendar days
198 and no disqualifying information concerning the applicant
199 has otherwise come to the sheriff's attention, the sheriff
200 shall issue a provisional permit, clearly designated on the

SB 908 36
201 certificate as such, which the applicant shall sign in the
202 presence of the sheriff or the sheriff's designee. This
203 permit, when carried with a valid Missouri driver's or
204 nondriver's license, shall permit the applicant to exercise
205 the same rights in accordance with the same conditions as
206 pertain to a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
207 permit issued under this section, provided that it shall not
208 serve as an alternative to a national instant criminal
209 background check required by 18 U.S.C. Section 922(t). The
210 provisional permit shall remain valid until such time as the
211 sheriff either issues or denies the permit under subsection
212 7 or 8 of this section. The sheriff shall revoke a
213 provisional permit issued under this subsection within
214 twenty-four hours of receipt of any report that identifies a
215 disqualifying record, and shall notify the concealed carry
216 permit system established under subsection 5 of section
217 650.350. The revocation of a provisional permit issued
218 under this section shall be prescribed in a manner
219 consistent to the denial and review of an application under
220 subsection 7 of this section.
221 7. The sheriff may refuse to approve an application
222 for a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit
223 if he or she determines that any of the requirements
224 specified in subsection 3 of this section have not been met,
225 or if he or she has a substantial and demonstrable reason to
226 believe that the applicant has rendered a false statement
227 regarding any of the provisions of sections 571.205 to
228 571.230. If the applicant is found to be ineligible, the
229 sheriff is required to deny the application, and notify the
230 applicant in writing, stating the grounds for denial and
231 informing the applicant of the right to submit, within

SB 908 37
232 thirty days, any additional documentation relating to the
233 grounds of the denial. Upon receiving any additional
234 documentation, the sheriff shall reconsider his or her
235 decision and inform the applicant within thirty days of the
236 result of the reconsideration. The applicant shall further
237 be informed in writing of the right to appeal the denial
238 under section 571.220. After two additional reviews and
239 denials by the sheriff, the person submitting the
240 application shall appeal the denial under section 571.220.
241 8. If the application is approved, the sheriff shall
242 issue a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit
243 to the applicant within a period not to exceed three working
244 days after his or her approval of the application. The
245 applicant shall sign the Missouri lifetime or extended
246 concealed carry permit in the presence of the sheriff or his
247 or her designee.
248 9. The Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
249 permit shall specify only the following information:
250 (1) Name, address, date of birth, gender, height,
251 weight, color of hair, color of eyes, and signature of the
252 permit holder;
253 (2) The signature of the sheriff issuing the permit;
254 (3) The date of issuance;
255 (4) A clear statement indicating that the permit is
256 only valid within the state of Missouri; and
257 (5) If the permit is a Missouri extended concealed
258 carry permit, the expiration date.
259 The permit shall be no larger than two and one-eighth inches
260 wide by three and three-eighths inches long and shall be of
261 a uniform style prescribed by the department of public
262 safety. The permit shall also be assigned a concealed carry

SB 908 38
263 permit system county code and shall be stored in sequential
264 number.
265 10. (1) The sheriff shall keep a record of all
266 applications for a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
267 carry permit or a provisional permit and his or her action
268 thereon. Any record of an application that is incomplete or
269 denied for any reason shall be kept for a period not to
270 exceed one year.
271 (2) The sheriff shall report the issuance of a
272 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit or
273 provisional permit to the concealed carry permit system.
274 All information on any such permit that is protected
275 information on any driver's or nondriver's license shall
276 have the same personal protection for purposes of sections
277 571.205 to 571.230. An applicant's status as a holder of a
278 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit or
279 provisional permit shall not be public information and shall
280 be considered personal protected information. Information
281 retained in the concealed carry permit system under this
282 subsection shall not be distributed to any federal, state,
283 or private entities and shall only be made available for a
284 single entry query of an individual in the event the
285 individual is a subject of interest in an active criminal
286 investigation or is arrested for a crime. A sheriff may
287 access the concealed carry permit system for administrative
288 purposes to issue a permit, verify the accuracy of permit
289 holder information, change the name or address of a permit
290 holder, suspend or revoke a permit, cancel an expired
291 permit, or cancel a permit upon receipt of a certified death
292 certificate for the permit holder. Any person who violates

SB 908 39
293 the provisions of this subdivision by disclosing protected
294 information shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
295 11. Information regarding any holder of a Missouri
296 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit is a closed
297 record. No bulk download or batch data shall be distributed
298 to any federal, state, or private entity, except to MoSMART
299 or a designee thereof.
300 12. For processing an application, the sheriff in each
301 county shall charge a nonrefundable fee not to exceed:
302 (1) Two hundred dollars for a new Missouri extended
303 concealed carry permit that is valid for ten years from the
304 date of issuance or renewal;
305 (2) Two hundred fifty dollars for a new Missouri
306 extended concealed carry permit that is valid for twenty-
307 five years from the date of issuance or renewal;
308 (3) Fifty dollars for a renewal of a Missouri extended
309 concealed carry permit;
310 (4) Five hundred dollars for a Missouri lifetime
311 concealed carry permit,
312 which shall be paid to the treasury of the county to the
313 credit of the sheriff's revolving fund.
1 571.225. 1. Any person who has knowledge that another
2 person, who was issued a Missouri lifetime or extended
3 concealed carry permit under sections 571.205 to 571.230,
4 never was or no longer is eligible for such permit under the
5 criteria established in sections 571.205 to 571.230 may file
6 a petition with the clerk of the small claims court to
7 revoke that person's Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
8 carry permit. The petition shall be in a form substantially
9 similar to the petition for revocation of a Missouri
10 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit provided in this

SB 908 40
11 section. [Appeal] Revocation petition forms shall be
12 provided by the clerk of the small claims court free of
13 charge to any person:
14 SMALL CLAIMS COURT
15 In the Circuit Court of ______, Missouri
16 ______, PLAINTIFF
17 )
18 )
19 vs. ) Case Number ______
20 )
21 )
22 ______, DEFENDANT,
23 Lifetime or Extended Carry Permit Holder
24 ______, DEFENDANT,
25 Sheriff of Issuance
26 PETITION FOR REVOCATION OF A
27 MISSOURI LIFETIME OR EXTENDED CONCEALED CARRY
28 PERMIT
29 Plaintiff states to the court that the
30 defendant, ______, has a Missouri lifetime or
31 extended concealed carry permit issued pursuant
32 to sections 571.205 to 571.230, RSMo, and that
33 the defendant's Missouri lifetime or extended
34 concealed carry permit should now be revoked
35 because the defendant either never was or no
36 longer is eligible for such a permit pursuant to
37 the provisions of sections 571.205 to 571.230,

SB 908 41
38 RSMo, specifically plaintiff states that
39 defendant, ______, never was or no longer is
40 eligible for such permit or endorsement for one
41 or more of the following reasons:
42 (CHECK BELOW EACH REASON THAT APPLIES TO THIS
43 DEFENDANT)
44 □ Defendant is not at least [nineteen] eighteen
45 years of age [or at least eighteen years of
46 age and a member of the United States Armed
47 Forces or honorably discharged from the United
48 States Armed Forces].
49 □ Defendant is not a citizen or permanent
50 resident of the United States.
51 □ Defendant had not resided in this state prior
52 to issuance of the permit or is not a current
53 resident of this state.
54 □ Defendant has pled guilty to or been convicted
55 of a crime punishable by imprisonment for a
56 term exceeding two years under the laws of any
57 state or of the United States other than a
58 crime classified as a misdemeanor under the
59 laws of any state and punishable by a term of
60 imprisonment of one year or less that does not
61 involve an explosive weapon, firearm, firearm
62 silencer, or gas gun.
63 □ Defendant has been convicted of, pled guilty
64 to or entered a plea of nolo contendere to one
65 or more misdemeanor offenses involving crimes
66 of violence within a five-year period
67 immediately preceding application for a
68 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
69 permit issued pursuant to sections 571.205 to
70 571.230, RSMo, or the defendant has been
71 convicted of two or more misdemeanor offenses
72 involving driving while under the influence of

SB 908 42
73 intoxicating liquor or drugs or the possession
74 or abuse of a controlled substance within a
75 five-year period immediately preceding
76 application for a concealed carry permit
77 issued pursuant to sections 571.205 to
78 571.230, RSMo.
79 □ Defendant is a fugitive from justice or
80 currently charged in an information or
81 indictment with the commission of a crime
82 punishable by imprisonment for a term
83 exceeding one year under the laws of any state
84 of the United States other than a crime
85 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of
86 any state and punishable by a term of
87 imprisonment of two years or less that does
88 not involve an explosive weapon, firearm,
89 firearm silencer, or gas gun.
90 □ Defendant has been discharged under
91 dishonorable conditions from the United States
92 Armed Forces.
93 □ Defendant is reasonably believed by the
94 sheriff to be a danger to self or others based
95 on previous, documented pattern.
96 □ Defendant is adjudged mentally incompetent at
97 the time of application or for five years
98 prior to application, or has been committed to
99 a mental health facility, as defined in
100 section 632.005, RSMo, or a similar
101 institution located in another state, except
102 that a person whose release or discharge from
103 a facility in this state pursuant to chapter
104 632, RSMo, or a similar discharge from a
105 facility in another state, occurred more than
106 five years ago without subsequent recommitment
107 may apply.

SB 908 43
108 □ Defendant failed to submit a completed
109 application for a concealed carry permit
110 issued pursuant to sections 571.205 to
111 571.230, RSMo.
112 □ Defendant failed to submit to or failed to
113 clear the required background check. (Note:
114 This does not apply if the defendant has
115 submitted to a background check and been
116 issued a provisional permit pursuant to
117 subdivision (2) of subsection 6 of section
118 571.205, RSMo, and the results of the
119 background check are still pending.)
120 □ Defendant failed to submit an affidavit
121 attesting that the applicant complies with the
122 concealed carry safety training requirement
123 pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 of section
124 571.111, RSMo.
125 □ Defendant is otherwise disqualified from
126 possessing a firearm pursuant to 18 U.S.C.
127 Section 922(g) or section 571.070, RSMo,
128 because ______ (specify reason):
129 The plaintiff subject to penalty for perjury
130 states that the information contained in this
131 petition is true and correct to the best of the
132 plaintiff's knowledge, is reasonably based upon
133 the petitioner's personal knowledge and is not
134 primarily intended to harass the
135 defendant/respondent named herein.
136 __________________ , PLAINTIFF
137 2. If at the hearing the plaintiff shows that the
138 defendant was not eligible for the Missouri lifetime or
139 extended concealed carry permit issued under sections
140 571.205 to 571.230 at the time of issuance or renewal or is
141 no longer eligible for a Missouri lifetime or extended

SB 908 44
142 concealed carry permit the court shall issue an appropriate
143 order to cause the revocation of the Missouri lifetime or
144 extended concealed carry permit. Costs shall not be
145 assessed against the sheriff.
146 3. The finder of fact, in any action brought against a
147 permit holder under subsection 1 of this section, shall make
148 findings of fact and the court shall make conclusions of law
149 addressing the issues at dispute. If it is determined that
150 the plaintiff in such an action acted without justification
151 or with malice or primarily with an intent to harass the
152 permit holder or that there was no reasonable basis to bring
153 the action, the court shall order the plaintiff to pay the
154 defendant/respondent all reasonable costs incurred in
155 defending the action including, but not limited to,
156 attorney's fees, deposition costs, and lost wages. Once the
157 court determines that the plaintiff is liable to the
158 defendant/respondent for costs and fees, the extent and type
159 of fees and costs to be awarded should be liberally
160 calculated in defendant/respondent's favor. Notwithstanding
161 any other provision of law, reasonable attorney's fees shall
162 be presumed to be at least one hundred fifty dollars per
163 hour.
164 4. Any person aggrieved by any final judgment rendered
165 by a small claims court in a petition for revocation of a
166 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit may
167 have a right to trial de novo as provided in sections
168 512.180 to 512.320.
169 5. The office of the county sheriff or any employee or
170 agent of the county sheriff shall not be liable for damages
171 in any civil action arising from alleged wrongful or
172 improper granting, renewing, or failure to revoke a Missouri
173 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit issued under

SB 908 45
174 sections 571.205 to 571.230 so long as the sheriff acted in
175 good faith.
✓